ru: Соответствие стандартам морской безопасности: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Соответствует требованиям СОЛАС; Одобрено Transport Canada; Одобрено Береговой охраной США; Другое
ko: 해양 안전 표준 준수: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; SOLAS 준수; 캐나다 교통부 승인; USCG 승인; 기타
zh-CN: 符合海事安全标准: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; 符合 SOLAS 标准; 获加拿大交通部批准; 获美国海岸警卫队 (USCG) 批准; 其他
es: Cumplimiento de normas de seguridad marítima: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Cumple con SOLAS; Aprobado por Transport Canada; Aprobado por USCG; Otro
zh-TW: 海上安全標準符合性: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; 符合 SOLAS 標準; 加拿大運輸部核准; USCG 核准; 其他
cs: Dodržování norem námořní bezpečnosti: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Splňuje požadavky SOLAS; Schváleno Transport Canada; Schváleno USCG; Jiné
en: Marine safety standard compliance: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; SOLAS compliant; Transport Canada approved; USCG approved; Other
fr: Conformité aux normes de sécurité maritime: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Conforme SOLAS; Approuvé par Transports Canada; Approuvé par l’USCG; Autre
vi: Tuân thủ tiêu chuẩn an toàn hàng hải: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Tuân thủ SOLAS; Được Transport Canada phê duyệt; Được USCG phê duyệt; Khác
sk-SK: Súlad s normami v oblasti námornej bezpečnosti: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; V súlade so SOLAS; Schválené ministerstvom Transport Canada; Schválené USCG; Iné
da: Overholdelse af sikkerhedsstandarder for skibsfart: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; I overensstemmelse med SOLAS; Godkendt af Transport Canada; USCG-godkendt; Andet
ja: 海上安全基準への準拠: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; SOLAS準拠; Transport Canada承認; USCG承認; その他
pt-PT: Conformidade com as normas de segurança marítima: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Em conformidade com SOLAS; Aprovado pela Transport Canada; Aprovado pela USCG; Outro
nl: Maritieme veiligheidsstandaard naleving: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Voldoet aan SOLAS; Goedgekeurd door Transport Canada; Goedgekeurd door USCG; Anders
ro-RO: Respectarea standardelor de siguranță maritimă: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Conform SOLAS; Aprobat de Transport Canada; Aprobat USCG; Altele
de: Einhaltung maritimer Sicherheitsstandards: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; SOLAS-konform; Transport Canada (zugelassen); USCG-Zulassung; Sonstige
hr-HR: Usklađenost sa standardima pomorske sigurnosti: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Sukladno sa SOLAS-om; Odobrio Transport Canada; Odobrio USCG; Ostalo
nb: Samsvar med maritime sikkerhetsstandarer: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; SOLAS-kompatibel; Godkjent av Transport Canada; USCG-godkjent; Annet
sv: Överensstämmelse med marin säkerhetsstandard: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Överensstämmer med SOLAS; Godkänd av Transport Canada; Godkänd av USCG; Annat
hu: Tengeri biztonsági szabványoknak való megfelelés: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; SOLAS-kompatibilis; Transport Canada által jóváhagyott; USCG által jóváhagyott; Egyéb
it: Conformità agli standard di sicurezza marittima: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Conforme a SOLAS; Approvazione Transport Canada; Approvazione USCG; Altro
sl-SI: Skladnost s pomorskimi varnostnimi standardi: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; V skladu s SOLAS; Odobreno s strani Transport Canada; Odobreno s strani USCG; Drugo
pl: Zgodność z normami bezpieczeństwa morskiego: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Zgodność z SOLAS; Zatwierdzone przez Transport Canada; Zatwierdzone przez USCG; Inne
fi: Meriturvallisuusstandardien noudattaminen: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; SOLAS-yhteensopiva; Transport Canadan hyväksymä; USCG-hyväksytty; Muu
lt-LT: Jūrų saugos standartų atitiktis: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Atitinka SOLAS; Patvirtinta „Transport Canada“; Patvirtinta USCG; Kita
th: การปฏิบัติตามมาตรฐานความปลอดภัยทางทะเล: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; สอดคล้องกับมาตรฐาน SOLAS; ผ่านการรับรองโดย Transport Canada; ผ่านการรับรองโดย USCG; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Segurança marítima conformidade com norma: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Em conformidade com SOLAS; Aprovado pela Transport Canada; Aprovado pela USCG; Outro
el: Συμμόρφωση με τα πρότυπα ναυτικής ασφάλειας: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Συμβατό με SOLAS; Εγκεκριμένο από την Transport Canada; Εγκεκριμένο από την USCG; Άλλο
tr: Denizcilik güvenlik standartlarına uyum: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; SOLAS uyumlu; Transport Canada onaylı; USCG onaylı; Diğer
bg-BG: Съответствие със стандартите за морска безопасност: CE EN ISO 12402; ISO 12402-7; Съвместим със SOLAS; Одобрено от Transport Canada; Одобрено от USCG; Друго